Maryland, session 2025, HB1363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
20–306.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1363*

HOUSE BILL 1363
(2) “Closed captioning” means a transcript or dialog of the audio portion of
a television program that is displayed on a television receiver screen when the user
activates the feature.
(3) “Closed movie captioning” means the written display of the dialog and
certain nonspeech information of a motion picture that is generally delivered to individual
patrons on a captioning device in a motion picture house.
(4) “Closed–captioning television receiver” means a receiver of television
programming that has the ability to display closed captioning, including a television, digital
set top box, and any other technology capable of displaying closed captioning.
(5) “Open movie captioning” means a transcript or dialog of the audio
portion of a motion picture that is displayed on a motion picture screen that cannot be
turned off by a viewer.
(6) “Public area” means a part of a place of public accommodation that is
open to the general public.
(7) “Regular hours” means the hours of any day in which a place of public
accommodation is open to members of the general public.
(b) (1) On request, a place of public accommodation may not fail to keep closed
captioning activated on any closed–captioning television receiver that is in use during
regular hours in any public area.
(2) This subsection does not require a place of public accommodation to
make closed captioning available in a public area of the place of public accommodation if:
(i) no television receiver of any kind is available in the public area;
or
(ii) the only public television receiver available in the public area is
not a closed–captioning television receiver.
(c) (1) A place of public accommodation that is a motion picture house shall
provide access to fully operational and well–maintained closed movie captioning technology
for the general public for each screening of a motion picture that is produced and available
with closed movie captioning as required by Title III of the federal Americans with
Disabilities Act.
(2) (i) This paragraph does not apply to motion pictures screened fewer
than five times from Friday through Thursday in a 7–day period in the motion picture
house.
(ii) This paragraph applies only to the first 3 weeks after a motion
picture premieres in the motion picture house.

HOUSE BILL 1363 3
(iii) If a motion picture is produced and available to motion picture
houses with open movie captioning, a place of public accommodation that controls, operates,
owns, or leases a motion picture house with [eight] FOUR or more screens in the State shall
provide open movie captioning for at least two screenings for each motion picture it screens
each week.
(iv) Beginning 3 weeks after a motion picture premieres, a place of
accommodation that controls, operates, owns, or leases a motion picture house with [eight]
FOUR or more screens in the State may provide open movie captioning with reasonable
notice.
(D) ON OR BEFORE THE 10TH DAY OF THE MONTH, EACH MONTH, A MOTION
PICTURE HOUSE THAT IS A PLACE OF PUBLIC ACCOMMODATION SHALL REPORT TO
THE COMMISSION AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ON:
(1) THE MOTION PICTURES SCREENED DURING THE PRECEDING
MONTH THAT USED CLOSED MOVIE CAPTIONING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION;
(2) IF APPLICABLE, THE MOTION PICTURES SCREENED DURING THE
PRECEDING MONTH THAT USED OPEN MOVIE CAPTIONING IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION; AND
(3) THE TIMES AND DATES THAT MOTION PICTURES DESCRIBED
UNDER ITEMS (1) AND (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION WERE SCREENED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.